Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1206.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "virtual manufacturer" in section 3 of the act of December 14, 1992 (P.L.1116, No.145), known as the Wholesale Prescription Drug Distributors License Act, added October 16, 2024 (P.L.988, No.101), is amended to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the <--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122 context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Virtual manufacturer." A person with a place of business located in this Commonwealth in the business of manufacturing and distributing a drug or medical device that:(1) Holds the drug or device approval and label code or is otherwise identified on the product label from the United States Food and Drug Administration[.] or has submitted an application to the United States Food and Drug Administration for approval of the drug or device or intends to submit an application for approval within 12 months.(2) At no time takes physical possession of any drug or device in this Commonwealth.* * *Section 2. Section 5(a) of the act is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 5. License application.(a) Information on application.--An applicant for a license shall provide the following information on a license application form approved by the department:* * * (6.2) If the applicant is a manufacturer of a prescription drug that has not been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration, a statement that the applicant has submitted an application to the United States Food and Drug Administration for approval of the prescription drug or that the applicant intends to submit an application for approval within 12 months. The department may not require approval of a prescription drug by the United States Food and Drug Administration as a condition of licensure under this 20260SB1206PN1838 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 act.(6.3) If the applicant is a virtual manufacturer that does not hold the drug or device approval and label code or is not otherwise identified on the product label from the United States Food and Drug Administration, a statement that the applicant has submitted an application to the United States Food and Drug Administration for approval of the drug or device or that the applicant intends to submit an application for approval within 12 months. The department may not require approval of a drug or medical device by the United States Food and Drug Administration as a condition of licensure under this act.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.SECTION 1. THE DEFINITION OF "VIRTUAL MANUFACTURER" IN SECTION 3 OF THE ACT OF DECEMBER 14, 1992 (P.L.1116, NO.145), KNOWN AS THE WHOLESALE PRESCRIPTION DRUG DISTRIBUTORS LICENSE ACT, ADDED OCTOBER 16, 2024 (P.L.988, NO.101), IS AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A DEFINITION TO READ:SECTION 3. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS ACT SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:* * *"TEMPORARY LICENSE." A LICENSE ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO A MANUFACTURER OR A VIRTUAL MANUFACTURER UNDER SECTION 5(A.2) FOR A DRUG OR MEDICAL DEVICE THAT HAS NOT YET RECEIVED FINAL APPROVAL FROM THE UNITED STATES FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION."VIRTUAL MANUFACTURER." A PERSON WITH A PLACE OF BUSINESS LOCATED IN THIS COMMONWEALTH IN THE BUSINESS OF MANUFACTURING 20260SB1206PN1838 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AND DISTRIBUTING A DRUG OR MEDICAL DEVICE THAT:[(1) HOLDS THE DRUG OR DEVICE APPROVAL AND LABEL CODE OR IS OTHERWISE IDENTIFIED ON THE PRODUCT LABEL FROM THE UNITED STATES FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION.](1) WITH RESPECT TO THE DRUG OR MEDICAL DEVICE:(I) HOLDS THE APPLICABLE APPROVAL, CLEARANCE, AUTHORIZATION OR LABELER CODE ISSUED BY THE UNITED STATES FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION OR IS OTHERWISE IDENTIFIED ON LABELING APPROVED, CLEARED OR AUTHORIZED BY THE UNITED STATES FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION; OR(II) FOR PURPOSES OF A TEMPORARY LICENSE, HAS SUBMITTED TO THE UNITED STATES FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION AND HAS PENDING BEFORE THE UNITED STATES FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION AN APPLICATION, PREMARKET NOTIFICATION, REQUEST OR OTHER SUBMISSION SEEKING APPROVAL, CLEARANCE OR AUTHORIZATION FOR THE DRUG OR MEDICAL DEVICE.(2) AT NO TIME TAKES PHYSICAL POSSESSION OF ANY DRUG OR DEVICE IN THIS COMMONWEALTH.* * *SECTION 2. SECTION 5 OF THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:SECTION 5. LICENSE APPLICATION.* * *(A.2) TEMPORARY LICENSE.-- (1) IF THE APPLICANT IS A MANUFACTURER OF A PRESCRIPTION DRUG OR A VIRTUAL MANUFACTURER OF A DRUG OR MEDICAL DEVICE THAT HAS NOT YET RECEIVED APPROVAL FROM THE UNITED STATES FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION, THE DEPARTMENT MAY ISSUE A TEMPORARY LICENSE IF THE APPLICANT SUBMITS ALL OF THE 20260SB1206PN1838 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FOLLOWING:(I) DOCUMENTATION DEMONSTRATING THAT AN APPLICATION FOR APPROVAL HAS BEEN SUBMITTED TO THE UNITED STATES FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION, INCLUDING, WHERE APPLICABLE:(A) A NEW DRUG APPLICATION NUMBER;(B) AN ABBREVIATED NEW DRUG APPLICATION NUMBER;(C) A BIOLOGICS LICENSE APPLICATION NUMBER;(D) A UNIQUE DEVICE IDENTIFICATION NUMBER;(E) A 510(K) PREMARKET NOTIFICATION; OR(F) OTHER DOCUMENTATION ACCEPTABLE TO THE DEPARTMENT DEMONSTRATING ACTIVE REVIEW BY THE UNITED STATES FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION.(II) DOCUMENTATION IDENTIFYING ANY CONTRACT MANUFACTURING ORGANIZATION OR LICENSED MANUFACTURING FACILITY INVOLVED IN THE MANUFACTURE, PACKAGING, LABELING OR DISTRIBUTION OF THE DRUG OR MEDICAL DEVICE.(III) DOCUMENTATION DEMONSTRATING COMPLIANCE WITH APPLICABLE REQUIREMENTS OF 21 U.S.C. CH. 9 SUBCH. V PT. H (RELATING TO PHARMACEUTICAL DISTRIBUTION SUPPLY CHAIN).(2) A TEMPORARY LICENSE ISSUED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1): (I) SHALL EXPIRE ONE YEAR AFTER ISSUANCE UNLESS RENEWED BY THE DEPARTMENT;(II) SHALL AUTOMATICALLY EXPIRE UPON DENIAL, WITHDRAWAL OR REFUSAL OF THE APPLICANT'S APPROVAL APPLICATION BY THE UNITED STATES FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION;(III) MAY NOT AUTHORIZE COMMERCIAL DISTRIBUTION OF A DRUG OR DEVICE UNLESS OTHERWISE PERMITTED UNDER FEDERAL LAW; AND(IV) DOES NOT CREATE A PROPERTY INTEREST IN THE 20260SB1206PN1838 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TEMPORARY LICENSE AND MAY BE SUSPENDED OR REVOKED BY THE DEPARTMENT FOR FAILURE TO MAINTAIN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS ACT OR APPLICABLE FEDERAL LAW.(3) AN APPLICANT ISSUED A TEMPORARY LICENSE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) SHALL NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT WITHIN FIVE BUSINESS DAYS OF:(I) APPROVAL, DENIAL, WITHDRAWAL OR REFUSAL OF AN APPLICATION BY THE UNITED STATES FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION; OR(II) ANY MATERIAL CHANGE TO THE APPLICANT'S MANUFACTURING OR DISTRIBUTION ARRANGEMENTS.(4) ISSUANCE OF A TEMPORARY LICENSE OR A LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED AS APPROVAL, ENDORSEMENT OR AUTHORIZATION OF A DRUG OR MEDICAL DEVICE BY THE COMMONWEALTH.(5) THE DEPARTMENT MAY PROMULGATE REGULATIONS AND DEVELOP MONITORING, REPORTING AND ENFORCEMENT PROCEDURES NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THIS SUBSECTION.(6) UPON SATISFACTORY PROOF PROVIDED BY THE TEMPORARY LICENSEE TO THE DEPARTMENT THAT ALL CONDITIONS FOR LICENSURE HAVE BEEN MET, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONVERT THE TEMPORARY LICENSE INTO A LICENSE WITHIN 30 DAYS.(7) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT RENEW A TEMPORARY LICENSE MORE THAN ONCE FOR THE SAME APPLICANT.* * *SECTION 3. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20260SB1206PN1838 - 6 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526